Missouri, session 2026, HB2674.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 285, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 285.680, to read as follows:
285.680. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Employ", the act of employing or the state of being employed, engaged, or
hired to perform work or services of any kind or character within the state of Missouri;
(2) "Employee", any person performing work or service of any kind or
character for hire within the state of Missouri;
(3) "Employee benefit plan", an employee welfare benefit plan or an employee
pension benefit plan or a plan that is both an employee welfare benefit plan and an
employee pension benefit plan;
(4) "Employer", any person that employs at least one employee, except that the
term "employer" shall not include any public employer, as defined in section 285.525;
(5) "Employment benefits", all benefits provided or made available to employees
by an employer, including life insurance, health insurance, disability insurance, sick
leave, annual leave, educational benefits, pensions, and profit-sharing, regardless of
whether such benefits are provided by a practice or written policy of an employer or
through an employee benefit plan;
(6) "Health care provider", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2674 2
(7) "Mental health appointment", any visit lasting less than four hours with a
health care provider to treat a mental disorder or mental illness, as those terms are
defined in section 630.005;
(8) "Person", an individual, partnership, association, corporation, business
trust, legal representative, or any organized group of persons;
(9) "Work", any job, task, labor, service, or other activity for which
compensation is provided, expected, or due.
2. An employee may take unpaid leave from work to attend mental health
appointments. An employee shall be entitled to unpaid leave for at least one mental
health appointment each week.
3. The provisions of this section shall not create a right for an employee to take
unpaid leave that exceeds the amount of unpaid leave time allowed under the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Section 2601 et seq.).
4. The employee shall provide the employer with at least forty-eight hours'
advance notice of the employee's intention to take leave under this section unless
providing such notice is not practicable. When an unscheduled absence occurs, the
employer shall not take any action against the employee if the employee, upon request of
the employer and within a reasonable period after the absence, provides certification
under subsection 5 of this section.
5. The employer may require the employee to provide certification to the
employer that the leave is for a mental health appointment. The employee shall provide
such certification to the employer within a reasonable period after the employer
requests certification.
6. An employee may satisfy the certification requirement of subsection 5 of this
section by providing to the employer a sworn statement of the employee and
documentation from the health care provider who treated the employee at the mental
health appointment.
7. All information provided to the employer under subsection 6 of this section,
including a statement of the employee or any other documentation, record, or
corroborating evidence, and the fact that the employee has requested or obtained leave
under this section, shall be retained in the strictest confidence by the employer, except to
the extent that disclosure is requested or consented to in writing by the employee or
otherwise required by applicable federal or state law.
8. Every employer shall annually notify its employees of the requirements of this
section.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede any provision of a
federal, state, or local law, collective bargaining agreement, or employment benefits

HB 2674 3
program or plan that provides greater leave benefits with respect to mental health
appointments than the rights established under this section.
10. The rights and remedies established for employees under this section shall
not be diminished by any federal, state, or local law, collective bargaining agreement, or
employment benefits program or plan.
✔